en: Shampoo
xx: Shampoo
cs: Šampon
da: Shampoo
de: Shampoos
es: Champú
fr: Shampooings
it: Shampoo
ja: シャンプー
nl: Shampoo
no: Sjampo
pl: Szampony
pt: Shampoos
ru: Шампуни
sv: Schampo
tr: Şampuan

en: Shampoo & Conditioner Sets
xx: Shampoo & Conditioner Sets
cs: Sady šamponu a kondicionéru
da: Shampoo- og conditionersæt
de: Sets aus Shampoo & Spülung
es: Kits de champú y acondicionador
fr: Packs shampooing et après-shampooing
it: Set shampoo e balsamo
ja: シャンプー・コンディショナーセット
nl: Shampoo- en conditionersets
no: Sett med sjampo og balsam
pl: Zestawy z szamponem i odżywką
pt: Conjuntos de shampoo e condicionador
ru: Наборы из шампуня и кондиционера
sv: Paket med schampo och balsam
tr: Şampuan ve Saç Kremi Paketleri

en: Massage & Relaxation
xx: Massage & Relaxation
cs: Masáže a relaxace
da: Massage og afslapning
de: Massage & Entspannung
es: Masaje y relajación
fr: Massage et relaxation
it: Massaggi e relax
ja: マッサージ・リラクゼーション
nl: Massage en ontspanning
no: Massasje og avslapning
pl: Masaż i relaks
pt: Massagem e relaxamento
ru: Массаж и релаксация
sv: Massage och avslappning
tr: Masaj ve Rahatlama

en: Back Scratchers
xx: Back Scratchers
cs: Drbátka na záda
da: Kløpinde
de: Rückenkratzer
es: Rascaespaldas
fr: Gratte-dos
it: Grattaschiena
ja: 孫の手
nl: Rugkrabbertjes
no: Ryggkløere
pl: Drapaczki do pleców
pt: Coçadores de costas
ru: Приспособления для чесания спины
sv: Ryggkliare
tr: Sırt Kaşıyıcılar

en: Eye Pillows
xx: Eye Pillows
cs: Polštářky na oči
da: Øjenpuder
de: Augenkissen
es: Almohadas para ojos
fr: Coussinets pour les yeux
it: Cuscini per gli occhi
ja: アイピロー
nl: Oogkussentjes
no: Øyeputer
pl: Poduszki na oczy
pt: Almofadas para os olhos
ru: Подушечки для глаз
sv: Ögonkuddar
tr: Göz Yastıkları

en: Massage Chairs
xx: Massage Chairs
cs: Masážní křesla
da: Massagestole
de: Massagestühle
es: Sillones de masaje
fr: Fauteuils de massage
it: Poltrone da massaggio
ja: マッサージチェア
nl: Massagestoelen
no: Massasjestoler
pl: Fotele do masażu
pt: Cadeiras de massagem
ru: Кресла для массажа
sv: Massagestolar
tr: Masaj Koltukları

en: Massage Oil
xx: Massage Oil
cs: Masážní oleje
da: Massageolie
de: Massageöle
es: Aceites para masaje
fr: Huiles de massage
it: Oli da massaggio
ja: マッサージオイル
nl: Massage-olie
no: Massasjeolje
pl: Olejki do masażu
pt: Óleos de massagem
ru: Массажные масла
sv: Massageolja
tr: Masaj Yağı

en: Massage Stone Warmers
xx: Massage Stone Warmers
cs: Ohřívače masážních kamenů
da: Massagestenvarmere
de: Massagestein-Wärmer
es: Calentadores de piedras de masaje
fr: Réchauffeurs de pierres de massage
it: Riscaldatori per pietre per massaggi
ja: ホットストーンウォーマー
nl: Verwarmers voor massagestenen
no: Varmere for massasjesteiner
pl: Podgrzewacze do kamieni do masażu
pt: Aquecedores para pedras de massagem
ru: Нагреватели для массажных камней
sv: Värmeapparater för massagestenar
tr: Masaj Taşı Isıtıcılar

en: Massage Stones
xx: Massage Stones
cs: Masážní kameny
da: Massagesten
de: Massagesteine
es: Piedras de masaje
fr: Pierres de massage
it: Pietre per massaggi
ja: ホットストーン
nl: Massagestenen
no: Massasjesteiner
pl: Kamienie do masażu
pt: Pedras de massagem
ru: Массажные камни
sv: Massagestenar
tr: Masaj Taşları

en: Massage Tables
xx: Massage Tables
cs: Masážní stoly
da: Massageborde
de: Massagetische
es: Mesas de masaje
fr: Tables de massage, Table de massage
it: Lettini da massaggio
ja: マッサージベッド
nl: Massagetafels
no: Massasjebord
pl: Stoły do masażu
pt: Mesas de massagem
ru: Массажные столы
sv: Massagebord
tr: Masaj Masaları

en: Massagers
xx: Massagers
cs: Masážní strojky
da: Massageapparater
de: Massagegeräte
es: Masajeadores
fr: Accessoires de massage
it: Massaggiatori
ja: マッサージ器
nl: Massageapparaten
no: Massasjeprodukter
pl: Masażery
pt: Massageadores
ru: Массажеры
sv: Massageapparater
tr: Masaj Aletleri

en: Electric Massagers
xx: Electric Massagers
cs: Elektrické masážní přístroje
da: Elektriske massageinstrumenter
de: Elektrische Massagegeräte
es: Masajeadores eléctricos
fr: Appareils de massage électriques
it: Massaggiatori elettrici
ja: 電気マッサージ器
nl: Elektrische massageapparaten
no: Elektriske massasjeapparater
pl: Masażery elektryczne
pt: Massageadores elétricos
ru: Электромассажёры
sv: Elektriska massageapparater
tr: Elektrikli Masaj Aletleri

en: Manual Massage Tools
xx: Manual Massage Tools
cs: Ruční masážní přístroje
da: Manuelle massageinstrumenter
de: Manuelle Massagegeräte
es: Utensilios para masaje manual
fr: Appareils de massage manuels
it: Strumenti per massaggi manuali
ja: 手動マッサージグッズ
nl: Handmatige massagetools
no: Manuelle massasjeapparater
pl: Urządzenia do masażu ręcznego
pt: Ferramentas para massagem manual
ru: Приспособления для ручного массажа
sv: Massageverktyg
tr: El Masaj Aletleri

en: Massage Cushions
xx: Massage Cushions
cs: Masážní polštářky
da: Massagepuder
de: Massagekissen
es: Cojines de masaje
fr: Coussins de massage
it: Cuscini massaggianti
ja: マッサージクッション
nl: Massagekussens
no: Massasjeputer
pl: Poduszki masujące
pt: Assentos massageadores
ru: Массажные подушки
sv: Massagekuddar
tr: Masaj Yastıkları

en: Oral Care
xx: Oral Care
cs: Péče o ústní dutinu
da: Mundpleje
de: Mundpflege
es: Cuidado bucal
fr: Soins buccaux
it: Igiene orale
ja: 口腔ケア
nl: Mondverzorging
no: Munnpleie
pl: Higiena jamy ustnej
pt: Cuidados bucais
ru: Средства для ухода за полостью рта
sv: Munvård
tr: Ağız Bakımı

en: Breath Spray
xx: Breath Spray
cs: Ústní sprej
da: Mundspray
de: Mundspray
es: Espray para el aliento
fr: Spray pour l'haleine
it: Spray alito fresco
ja: 口臭予防スプレー
nl: Mondspray
no: Munnspray
pl: Odświeżacze do ust
pt: Spray bucal
ru: Дезодоранты для полости рта
sv: Munspray
tr: Ağız Spreyleri

en: Dental Floss
xx: Dental Floss
cs: Zubní nitě
da: Tandtråd
de: Zahnseide
es: Hilo dental
fr: Fil dentaire
it: Filo interdentale
ja: デンタルフロス
nl: Flossdraad
no: Tanntråd
pl: Nici dentystyczne
pt: Fio-dental
ru: Зубные нити
sv: Tandtråd
tr: Diş İplikleri

en: Dental Mouthguards
xx: Dental Mouthguards
cs: Chrániče zubů
da: Tandbeskyttere
de: Aufbissschienen
es: Férulas dentales
fr: Gouttières dentaires
it: Bite antibruxismo
ja: デンタルマウスピース
nl: Gebitsbeschermers
no: Tannbeskyttere
pl: Ochraniacze zębów
pt: Protetores bucais
ru: Каппы
sv: Tandskydd
tr: Dişlikler

en: Dental Water Jet Replacement Tips
xx: Dental Water Jet Replacement Tips
cs: Náhradní nástavce pro ústní sprchy
da: Udskiftelige dyser til mundskyllere
de: Ersatzdüsen für Mundduschen
es: Cabezales de recambio para irrigadores dentales
fr: Embouts de rechange pour hydropulseurs dentaires
it: Punte sostitutive per idropulsori dentali
ja: 口腔洗浄器用替えチップ
nl: Vervangingsopzetstukken voor mondwatersproeiers
no: Dyser til munndusj
pl: Końcówki zapasowe do irygatorów dentystycznych
pt: Refis para jatos de água
ru: Запасные насадки для ирригаторов полости рта
sv: Ersättningsmunstycken för munduschar
tr: Ağız Banyosu Yedek Uçları

en: Dental Water Jets
xx: Dental Water Jets
cs: Ústní sprchy
da: Mundskyllere
de: Mundduschen
es: Irrigadores dentales
fr: Hyrdropulseurs
it: Idropulsori dentali
ja: 口腔洗浄器
nl: Tanddouches
no: Vannpirkere
pl: Irygatory dentystyczne
pt: Jatos de água para limpeza bucal
ru: Ирригаторы полости рта
sv: Munduschar
tr: Ağız Banyoları